Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-237
Sections, how construed.

Sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 shall be so interpreted and construed as to make uniform so far as possible the laws and regulations of this state and other states and of the government of the United States having to do with the subject of aeronautics.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 16, p. 169.

Uniformity of construction of act is sought. Brasier v. Cribbett, 166 Neb. 145, 88 N.W.2d 235 (1958).